Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2688.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-708, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-708. Annual report; state employee salaries; full-time equivalent positions; vacant positions; applicability; definitions A. On or before October 1 of each year, the department shall collect from each budget unit and shall submit to the joint legislative budget committee and the governor's office of strategic planning and budgeting a report containing the number of full-time equivalent positions and the total amount of salaries for each budget unit for the prior fiscal year, delineated by: 1. Retirement system. 2. Employee tier. 3. Fund source. B. the department shall also collect a list from each budget unit of all vacant, full-time EQUIVALENT positions that have been vacant for at least one hundred fifty days to include in the report submitted PURSUANT to subsection A of this section. B. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Budget unit": (a) Means a department, commission, board, institution or other agency of this state that receives, expends or disburses state monies or incurs obligations of this state. (b) Does not include the Arizona board of regents, universities under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents and community college districts. 2. "Employee tier" means a class of employees in a retirement system in which each employee is subject to the same employer contribution rate pursuant to title 38, chapter 5.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. Agency vacancies; elimination; full-time equivalent positions; adjustment; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, each fiscal year A budget unit shall eliminate any positions within the budget unit that have been vacant for more than one hundred fifty days. The budget unit's allocated FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITIONS shall be adjusted to reflect the elimination of any vacant positions. B. For the purposes of this section, "Budget unit": 1. Means a department, commission, board, institution or other agency of this state that receives, spends or disburses state monies or incurs obligations of this state. 2. Does not include THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS, THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY, the Arizona board of regents, universities under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents and community college districts. END_STATUTE